Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1798.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Contractor Bonding for Adjoining Properties Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adjoining property." Real property which is physically connected to the adjacent real property in which construction work is being performed and which is zoned residential or dual-use by a municipality or municipal authority."Contractor." A person that owns and operates a home improvement business or who undertakes, offers to undertake or 1234567891011121314151617 agrees to perform any home improvement. The term includes a subcontractor or independent contractor who has contracted with a home improvement retailer, regardless of the home improvement retailer's net worth, to provide home improvement services to the home improvement retailer's customers. The term does not include any of the following:(1) A person for whom the total cash value of all of that person's home improvements is less than $5,000 during the previous taxable year.(2) A home improvement retailer having a net worth of more than $50,000,000 or an employee of that retailer that does not perform home improvements."Home improvement." The following:(1) The term includes all of the following done in connection with land or a portion of the land adjacent to a private residence or a building or a portion of the building which is used or designed to be used as a private residence for which the total cash price of all work agreed upon between the contractor and owner is more than $500:(i) Repair, replacement, remodeling, demolition, removal, renovation, installation, alteration, conversion, modernization, improvement, rehabilitation or sandblasting.(ii) Construction, replacement, installation or improvement of driveways, swimming pools, pool houses, porches, garages, roofs, siding, insulation, solar energy systems, security systems, flooring, patios, fences, gazebos, sheds, cabanas, landscaping of a type that is not excluded under paragraph (2)(vi), painting, doors and windows and waterproofing.20250HB1798PN2212 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Without regard to affixation, the installation of central heating, air conditioning, storm windows or awnings.(2) The term does not include:(i) The sale of goods or materials by a seller that neither arranges to nor performs, directly or indirectly, any work or labor in connection with the installation or application of the goods or materials.(ii) The sale of services furnished for commercial or business use or for resale, if the service takes place somewhere other than at a private residence.(iii) The sale of appliances, including stoves, refrigerators, freezers, room air conditioners and others which are designed for and are easily removable from the premises without material alteration.(iv) Any work performed without compensation by the owner of the owner's private residence or residential rental property.(v) Any work performed by a landscaper certified by the Department of Agriculture under the act of December 16, 1992 (P.L.1228, No.162), known as the Plant Pest Act, except to the extent that the work involves any of the following at a private residence:(A) The construction, replacement, installation or improvement of buildings, driveways, swimming pools, porches, garages, roofs, siding, insulation, solar energy systems, security systems, flooring, patios, nondecorative fences, doors, lighting systems, concrete walkways and windows.(B) The placement of retaining walls, fountains 20250HB1798PN2212 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or drainage systems.(vi) Emergency work under section 7 of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(vii) The conversion of existing commercial structures into residential or noncommercial structures."Home improvement retailer." A person that sells materials for use in home improvement contracts.Section 3. Bonding requirement.(a) Surety bond.--A contractor performing a home improvement project or a new home construction project on adjoining property shall purchase a surety bond of $500,000 for each property adjoining the property on which the home improvement project or a new home construction project is being performed. The bond shall only be used to cover damages to a property caused by a home improvement project or a new home construction project on an adjoining property.(b) Proof.--Proof of bonding must be submitted to the municipality in which the home improvement project or a new home construction project is being performed at the time of issuance of a building permit.Section 4. Violation and penalties.If a contractor is found to be in violation of section 3, the contractor shall be subject to the following:(1) A civil penalty of $10,000 for the first offense.(2) A civil penalty of $20,000 for each subsequent offense.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1798PN2212 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829